Utah statutes.
78A-10-105.   Senate confirmation of judicial appointments -- Courts of record.

(1)  The Senate shall:

(a)  consider and decide on each judicial appointment within 60 days of the date of appointment; and

(b)  if necessary, convene itself in extraordinary session to consider a judicial appointment.

(2)  If the Senate fails to approve the appointment, the office is considered vacant and a new nominating process begins.

(3)  An appointment is effective upon approval of a majority of all members of the Senate.

(4)  The judicial nominating commission, the governor, the chief justice, and the Senate shall nominate and select judges based solely upon consideration of their fitness for office without regard to any partisan political considerations.



Enacted by Chapter 134, 2010 General Session

